Illinois, session 104th, SB2480.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4Article 5. Illinois African American Commission 5    Section 5-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 6Illinois African American Commission Act. References in this 7Article to "this Act" mean this Article. 8    Section 5-10. Purpose and objectives. The purpose of the 9Illinois African American Commission is to be an independent 10voice and represent the priorities of the African American 11community and advocate for policies, programs, and services 12that promote greater equity and inclusion in State government. 13The Illinois African American Commission works directly with 14the Governor, the General Assembly, constitutional officers, 15and State agencies to develop new and to improve existing 16policies, services, programs, and opportunities for Illinois 17African American families. The African American Commission 18shall: 19        (1) advocate for State policies, programs, and 20    services that improve equity, inclusion, and the quality 21    of life of African Americans; 22        (2) develop and advance recommendations to the   SB2480- 2 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    Governor, the General Assembly, and other State entities 2    such as constitutional officers and State courts to reduce 3    disparities and disproportionality experienced by African 4    Americans; 5        (3) identify priorities, goals, and objectives 6    reflecting an African American policy agenda to guide the 7    Commission's work;8        (4) monitor the impact of and shape legislation, 9    policies, programs, and practices to ensure that they are 10    responsive to African Americans in Illinois;11        (5) collaborate with the Governor's office, the 12    General Assembly, constitutional officers, State courts, 13    State agencies, and boards and commissions in developing 14    new and shaping existing programs, services, policies, and 15    initiatives to expand and enhance the social and economic 16    well-being of African American children and families;17        (6) facilitate the participation and representation of 18    African Americans in the development, implementation, and 19    planning of policies, programs, and services;20        (7) engage in and promote research efforts concerning 21    African Americans that can inform policies, programs, and 22    services to ensure greater equity and accountability;23        (8) create and approve the annual budget and have sole 24    authority over expenditures in line with the Illinois 25    Procurement Code and the rules adopted under that code;26        (9) hire an executive director to administer   SB2480- 3 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    operations;2        (10) make or enter into contracts with third parties 3    as necessary and convenient for the exercise of its powers 4    and duties, including defining personnel needs and hiring 5    staff as required to perform its duties under this Act; 6    all procurement must follow State policy and procedures;7        (11) co-convene quarterly roundtable meetings with the 8    Illinois Latino Commission, and the Illinois Asian 9    American Commission, to identify opportunities for 10    collaboration and alignment;11        (12) hold at least 2 public hearings annually to 12    assist in the development of recommendations for the 13    Governor, the General Assembly, and other State entities;14        (13) exercise such other powers as are necessary or 15    incidental to the administration of this Act or the 16    performance of duties under this Act; and17        (14) apply for, receive, establish priorities for, 18    allocate, disburse, and spend grants funds that are made 19    available to the Commission. 20    Section 5-15. Appointment; terms. The Illinois African- 21American Commission shall be composed of 15 members. As soon 22as practical after the effective date of this Act, but no later 23than July 1, 2025, the Governor, the President of the Senate, 24the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 25Representatives, and the Minority Leader of the House of   SB2480- 4 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1Representatives shall each appoint 3 members to the 2Commission. At the first meeting of the Commission, the 3members shall select a 5-person Steering Committee that 4includes the co-chairs. The chairperson or chairpersons shall 5each serve for a 2-year term.6    Members shall serve 3-year terms, except in the case of 7the following initial appointments: each appointing authority 8shall each appoint 2 members to a 2-year term and one member to 9a 3-year term. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 10contrary, members may be reappointed to a 3-year term.11    Thereafter, each member shall serve for a term of 3 years 12and until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. A 13vacancy occurring other than at the end of a term shall be 14filled by the initial appointing authority only for the 15balance of the term of the member whose office is vacant and 16until a successor is appointed and qualified. No member shall 17serve more than 2 terms, excluding any partial term resulting 18from a filled vacancy. Members will serve without 19compensation, but shall be reimbursed for Commission-related 20expenses. 21    Appointing authorities shall ensure, to the maximum extent 22practicable, that the Commission is diverse with respect to 23age, gender, and geography to ensure the needs of African 24American families and children through the State are met. 25Members shall be persons with recognized ability and 26experience in one or more of the following areas: education,   SB2480- 5 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1business, social services, human services, community 2development, labor, economic policy, criminal justice, 3immigration, or health care.4    The Commission may establish committees that address 5specific issues or populations and may appoint individuals 6with relevant expertise who are not appointed members of the 7Commission to serve on committees as needed. 8    Section 5-20. Organizational meeting. Commission members 9shall be appointed within 60 days after the effective date of 10this Act, but no later than July 1st, 2025. The Commission 11shall hold its organizational meeting within 60 days after at 12least 50% of the members who are to be appointed under Section 135-15 have been appointed. 14    Section 5-25. Funding. Illinois African American 15Commission may receive its own appropriation. The Illinois 16African American Commission may receive additional 17appropriations through the Commission on Equity and Inclusion 18or other designated agency. The Commission on Equity and 19Inclusion or designated agency shall expend funds set aside 20for the Commission at the Commission's direction. 21    Section 5-30. Reporting. By January 1 of each year, the 22Illinois African American Commission shall submit to the 23Governor and the General Assembly a report detailing progress   SB2480- 6 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1toward the goals and objectives of the Commission. The report 2shall detail, at a minimum, the Commission's work with 3agencies under the Governor, the Commission's current and 4ongoing research projects, and any legislative activity 5undertaken by the Commission. 6    Section 5-35. Administrative support. Notwithstanding any 7provision of law to the contrary, the Commission on Equity and 8Inclusion shall, at the request of the Illinois African 9American Commission, provide administrative and technical 10support to assist the Commission in carrying out its duties. 11Administrative and technical support includes providing 12guidance on State rules and regulations pertaining to 13contracts, expenditures, and payments to ensure compliance 14with State procurement policies and processes. The Commission 15on Equity and Inclusion shall provide assistance to the 16Illinois African American Commission as requested, including 17access to office space, technology, and other supports 18necessary for effective operations. 19    (20 ILCS 3903/Act rep.)20    Section 5-90. The African American Family Commission Act 21is repealed. 22Article 10. Illinois Asian American Commission   SB2480- 7 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    Section 10-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 2Illinois Asian American Commission Act. References in this 3Article to "this Act" mean this Article. 4    Section 10-10. Purpose and objectives. The purpose of the 5Illinois Asian American Commission is to be an independent 6voice and represent the priorities of the Illinois Asian 7American community and greater equity and inclusion in State 8government. The Illinois Asian American Commission works 9directly with the Governor, the General Assembly, 10constitutional officers, and State agencies to develop new and 11improve existing policies, services, programs, and 12opportunities for Asian American families. The Illinois Asian 13American Commission shall: 14        (1) advocate for State policies, programs, and 15    services that improve equity, inclusion, and the quality 16    of life of Asian Americans; 17        (2) develop and advance recommendations to the 18    Governor, the General Assembly, and other State entities 19    such as constitutional officers and State courts to reduce 20    disparities and disproportionality experienced by Asian 21    Americans; 22        (3) identify priorities, goals, and objectives 23    reflecting an Asian American policy agenda to guide the 24    Commission's work;25        (4) monitor the impact of and shape legislation,   SB2480- 8 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    policies, programs, and practices to ensure that they are 2    responsive to Asian Americans in Illinois;3        (5) collaborate with the Governor's office, the 4    General Assembly, constitutional officers, State courts, 5    State agencies, and boards and commissions in developing 6    new and shaping existing programs, services, policies, and 7    initiatives to expand and enhance the social and economic 8    well-being of Asian American children and families;9        (6) facilitate the participation and representation of 10    Asian Americans in the development, implementation, and 11    planning of policies, programs, and services;12        (7) engage in and promote research efforts concerning 13    Asian Americans that can inform policies, programs, and 14    services to ensure greater equity and accountability;15        (8) create and approve the annual budget and have sole 16    authority over expenditures in line with The Illinois 17    Procurement Code and the rules adopted under that code;18        (9) hire an executive director to administer 19    operations;20        (10) make or enter into contracts with third parties 21    as necessary and convenient for the exercise of its powers 22    and duties, including defining personnel needs and hiring 23    staff as required to perform its duties under this Act; 24    all procurement must follow State policy and procedures;25        (11) co-convene quarterly roundtable meetings with the 26    Latino Commission, the Illinois African American   SB2480- 9 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    Commission, and the Department of Human Rights to identify 2    opportunities for collaboration and alignment; 3        (12) hold at least 2 public hearings annually to 4    assist in the development of recommendations for the 5    Governor, the General Assembly, and other State entities; 6        (13) exercise such other powers as are necessary or 7    incidental to the administration of this Act or the 8    performance of duties under this Act; and9        (14) apply for, receive, establish priorities for, 10    allocate, disburse, and spend grants funds that are made 11    available to the Commission. 12    Section 10-15. Appointment; terms. The Illinois Asian 13American Commission shall be composed of 15 members. As soon 14as practical after the effective date of this Act, but no later 15than July 1, 2025, the Governor, the President of the Senate, 16the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 17Representatives, and the Minority Leader of the House of 18Representatives shall each appoint 3 members to the 19Commission. At the first meeting of the Commission members 20shall select a 5-person Steering Committee that includes the 21co-chairs. The chairperson or chairpersons shall each serve 22for a 2-year term. Members shall serve 3-year terms, except in 23the case of the following initial appointments: each 24appointing authority shall each appoint 2 members to a 2-year 25term and one member to a 3-year term. Notwithstanding any   SB2480- 10 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1provision of law to the contrary, members may be reappointed 2to a 3-year term. Thereafter, each member shall serve for a 3term of 3 years and until the member's successor is appointed 4and qualified. A vacancy occurring other than at the end of a 5term shall be filled by the initial appointing authority only 6for the balance of the term of the member whose office is 7vacant and until a successor is appointed and qualified. No 8member shall serve more than 2 terms, excluding any partial 9term resulting from a filled vacancy. Members will serve 10without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for 11Commission-related expenses.12     Members shall serve 3-year terms, except in the case of 13the following initial appointments: each appointing authority 14shall each appoint 2 members to a 2-year term and one member to 15a 3-year term. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 16contrary, members may be reappointed to a 3-year term. 17     Thereafter, each member shall serve for a term of 3 years 18and until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. A 19vacancy occurring other than at the end of a term shall be 20filled by the initial appointing authority only for the 21balance of the term of the member whose office is vacant and 22until a successor is appointed and qualified. No member shall 23serve more than 2 terms, excluding any partial term resulting 24from a filled vacancy. Members will serve without 25compensation, but shall be reimbursed for Commission-related 26expenses.   SB2480- 11 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    Appointing authorities shall ensure, to the maximum extent 2practicable, that the Commission is diverse with respect to 3age, gender, and geography to ensure the needs of Asian 4American families and children through the State are met. 5Members shall be persons with recognized ability and 6experience in one or more of the following areas: education, 7business, social services, human services, community 8development, labor, economic policy, criminal justice, 9immigration, or health care.10    The Commission may establish committees that address 11specific issues or populations and may appoint individuals 12with relevant expertise who are not appointed members of the 13Commission to serve on committees as needed. 14    Section 10-20. Organizational meeting. Commission members 15shall be appointed within 60 days after the effective date of 16this Act, but no later than July 1st, 2025. The Commission 17shall hold its organizational meeting within 60 days after at 18least 50% of the members who are to be appointed under Section 1910-15 have been appointed. 20    Section 10-25. Funding. Illinois Asian American Commission 21may receive its own appropriation. The Illinois Asian American 22Commission may receive additional appropriations through the 23Commission on Equity and Inclusion or other designated agency. 24The Commission on Equity and Inclusion or designated agency   SB2480- 12 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1shall expend funds set aside for the Commission at the 2Commission's direction. 3    Section 10-30. Reporting. By January 1 of each year, the 4Illinois Asian American Commission shall submit to the 5Governor and the General Assembly a report detailing progress 6toward the goals and objectives of the Commission. The report 7shall detail, at a minimum, the Commission's work with 8agencies under the Governor, the Commission's current and 9ongoing research projects, and any legislative activity 10undertaken by the Commission. 11    Section 10-35. Administrative support. Notwithstanding any 12provision of law to the contrary, the Commission on Equity and 13Inclusion shall, at the request of the Illinois Asian American 14Commission, provide administrative and technical support to 15assist the Commission in carrying out its duties. 16Administrative and technical support includes providing 17guidance on State rules and regulations pertaining to 18contracts, expenditures, and payments to ensure compliance 19with State procurement policies and processes. The Commission 20on Equity and Inclusion shall provide assistance to the 21Illinois Asian American Commission as requested, including 22access to office space, technology, and other supports 23necessary for effective operations.   SB2480- 13 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    (20 ILCS 3916/Act rep.)2    Section 10-90. The Asian American Family Commission Act is 3repealed. 4Article 15. Illinois Latino Commission 5    Section 15-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 6Illinois Latino Commission Act. References in this Article to 7"this Act" mean this Article. 8    Section 15-10. Purpose and objectives. The purpose of the 9Illinois Latino Commission is to be an independent voice and 10represent the priorities of the Latino community and advocate 11for policies, programs, and services that promote greater 12equity and inclusion in State government. The Illinois Latino 13Commission works directly with the Governor, the General 14Assembly, constitutional officers, and State agencies to 15develop new and improve existing policies, services, programs, 16and opportunities for families. The Illinois Latino Commission 17shall: 18        (1) advocate for State policies, programs, and 19    services that improve equity, inclusion, and the quality 20    of life of Latinos;21        (2) develop and advance recommendations to the 22    Governor, the General Assembly, and other State entities 23    such as constitutional officers and State courts to reduce   SB2480- 14 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    disparities and disproportionality experienced by Latinos;2        (3) identify priorities, goals, and objectives 3    reflecting an Latino policy agenda to guide the 4    Commission's work;5        (4) monitor the impact of and shape legislation, 6    policies, programs, and practices to ensure that they are 7    responsive to Latino in Illinois;8        (5) collaborate with the Governor's office, the 9    General Assembly, constitutional officers, State courts, 10    State agencies, and boards and commissions in developing 11    new and shaping existing programs, services, policies, and 12    initiatives to expand and enhance the social and economic 13    well-being of Latino children and families;14        (6) facilitate the participation and representation of 15    Latino in the development, implementation, and planning of 16    policies, programs, and services;17        (7) engage in and promote research efforts concerning 18    Latino that can inform policies, programs, and services to 19    ensure greater equity and accountability;20        (8) create and approve the annual budget and have sole 21    authority over expenditures in line with The Illinois 22    Procurement Code and the rules adopted under that code;23        (9) hire an executive director to administer 24    operations;25        (10) make or enter into contracts with third parties 26    as necessary and convenient for the exercise of its powers   SB2480- 15 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    and duties, including defining personnel needs and hiring 2    staff as required to perform its duties under this Act; 3    all procurement must follow State policy and procedures; 4        (11) co-convene quarterly roundtable meetings with the 5    Illinois African American Commission, the Illinois Asian 6    American Commission, and the Department of Human Rights to 7    identify opportunities for collaboration and alignment; 8        (12) hold at least 2 public hearings annually to 9    assist in the development of recommendations for the 10    Governor, the General Assembly, and other State entities; 11        (13) exercise such other powers as are necessary or 12    incidental to the administration of this Act or the 13    performance of duties under this Act; and 14        (14) apply for, receive, establish priorities for, 15    allocate, disburse, and spend grants funds that are made 16    available to the Commission. 17    Section 15-15. Appointment; terms. The Illinois Latino 18Commission shall be composed of 15 members. As soon as 19practical after the effective date of this Act, but no later 20than July 1, 2025, the Governor, the President of the Senate, 21the Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 22Representatives, and the Minority Leader of the House of 23Representatives shall each appoint 3 members to the 24Commission. At the first meeting of the Commission, the 25members shall select a 5-person Steering Committee that   SB2480- 16 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1includes the co-chairs Commission members shall elect the 2chairperson or chairpersons by a majority vote of the 3appointed members, and the chairperson or chairpersons shall 4each serve for a 2-year term.5    Members shall serve 3-year terms, except in the case of 6the following initial appointments: each appointing authority 7shall each appoint 2 members to a 2-year term and one member to 8a 3-year term. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 9contrary, members may be reappointed to a 3-year term. 10Thereafter, each member shall serve for a term of 3 years and 11until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. A 12vacancy occurring other than at the end of a term shall be 13filled by the initial appointing authority only for the 14balance of the term of the member whose office is vacant and 15until a successor is appointed and qualified. No member shall 16serve more than 2 terms, excluding any partial term resulting 17from a filled vacancy. Members will serve without 18compensation, but shall be reimbursed for Commission-related 19expenses.20    Thereafter, each member shall serve for a term of 3 years 21and until the member's successor is appointed and qualified. A 22vacancy occurring other than at the end of a term shall be 23filled by the initial appointing authority only for the 24balance of the term of the member whose office is vacant and 25until a successor is appointed and qualified. No member shall 26serve more than 2 terms, excluding any partial term resulting   SB2480- 17 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1from a filled vacancy. Members will serve without 2compensation, but shall be reimbursed for Commission-related 3expenses. 4    Appointing authorities shall ensure, to the maximum extent 5practicable, that the Commission is diverse with respect to 6age, gender, and geography to ensure the needs of Latino 7families and children through the State are met. Members shall 8be persons with recognized ability and experience in one or 9more of the following areas: education, business, social 10services, human services, community development, labor, 11economic policy, criminal justice, immigration, or health 12care.13    The Commission may establish committees that address 14specific issues or populations and may appoint individuals 15with relevant expertise who are not appointed members of the 16Commission to serve on committees as needed. 17    Section 15-20. Organizational meeting. Commission members 18shall be appointed within 60 days after the effective date of 19this Act, but no later than July 1st, 2025. The Commission 20shall hold its organizational meeting within 60 days after at 21least 50% of the members who are to be appointed under Section 2215-15 have been appointed. 23    Section 15-25. Funding. The Illinois Latino Commission may 24receive its own appropriation. The Illinois Latino Commission   SB2480- 18 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1may receive additional appropriations through the Commission 2on Equity and Inclusion or other designated agency. The 3Commission on Equity and Inclusion or designated agency shall 4expend funds set aside for the Commission at the Commission's 5direction. 6    Section 15-30. Reporting. By January 1 of each year, the 7Illinois Latino Commission shall submit to the Governor and 8the General Assembly a report detailing progress toward the 9goals and objectives of the Commission. The report shall 10detail, at a minimum, the Commission's work with agencies 11under the Governor, the Commission's current and ongoing 12research projects, and any legislative activity undertaken by 13the Commission. 14    Section 15-35. Administrative support. Notwithstanding any 15provision of law to the contrary, the Commission on Equity and 16Inclusion shall, at the request of the Illinois Latino 17Commission, provide administrative and technical support to 18assist the Commission in carrying out its duties. 19Administrative and technical support includes providing 20guidance on State rules and regulations pertaining to 21contracts, expenditures, and payments to ensure compliance 22with State procurement policies and processes. The Commission 23on Equity and Inclusion provide assistance to the Illinois 24Latino Commission as requested, including access to office   SB2480- 19 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1space, technology, and other supports necessary for effective 2operations. 3    (20 ILCS 3983/Act rep.)4    Section 15-90. The Illinois Latino Family Commission Act 5is repealed. 6Article 20. Amendatory Provisions 7    Section 20-5. The Violence Prevention Task Force Act is 8amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 9    (20 ILCS 4028/5)10    Sec. 5. Violence Prevention Task Force; members. 11    (a) There is created the Violence Prevention Task Force 12(hereinafter referred to as the Task Force) consisting of 6 13members appointed as follows:14        (1) one member of the Senate appointed by the 15    President of the Senate;16        (2) one member of the Senate appointed by the Minority 17    Leader of the Senate;18        (3) one member of the House of Representatives 19    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; 20        (4) one member of the House of Representatives 21    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 22    Representatives; and  SB2480- 20 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1        (5) 2 members appointed by the Governor, one of whom 2    shall be designated the chairperson by the Governor.3    (b) The members of the Task Force shall serve without 4compensation but shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and 5necessary expenses from funds appropriated for that purpose.6    (c) The Task Force may employ skilled experts with the 7approval of the chairperson, and shall receive the cooperation 8of those State agencies it deems appropriate to assist the 9Task Force in carrying out its duties.10    (d) The Illinois African American African-American Family 11Commission, the Illinois Department of Public Health, and the 12Illinois Latino Family Commission shall provide administrative 13and other support to the Task Force.14(Source: P.A. 98-194, eff. 8-7-13; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14.) 15    Section 20-10. The Commission on Children and Youth Act is 16amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 17    (20 ILCS 4075/15)18    Sec. 15. Commission members; appointments. The Commission 19shall be composed of the following members, to be appointed 20within 60 days after the effective date of this Act: 21    (a) Four members of the General Assembly: 2 members of the 22Illinois Senate, one member appointed by the President of the 23Senate and one member appointed by the Senate Minority Leader; 242 members of the Illinois House of Representatives, one member   SB2480- 21 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1appointed by the Speaker of the House and one member appointed 2by the House Minority Leader.3    (b) A member of the Governor's leadership team appointed 4by the Governor, who shall serve as one of the co-chairs of the 5Commission. 6    (c) Up to 30 public members appointed by the Governor with 7demonstrated interest and expertise in children and youth 8across the major stages of child and adolescent development. 9Public members shall include rural, suburban and urban 10entities; direct service providers; child advocates; human 11rights organizations; faith-based service providers; 12philanthropic organizations that invest in children and youth; 13at least 3 parents of children under the age of 16; and at 14least 3 young people between the ages of 16 and 24. A second 15co-chair of the Commission shall be elected from among the 16public members of the Commission by the public members. 17    (d) The following shall serve as ex-officio members of the 18Commission: the Director of Children and Family Services or 19his or her designee; the Director of Commerce and Economic 20Opportunity or his or her designee; the Director of 21Corrections or his or her designee; the Director of Employment 22Security or his or her designee; the Director of Healthcare 23and Family Services or his or her designee; the Secretary of 24Human Services or his or her designee; the Director of 25Juvenile Justice or his or her designee; the Director of 26Public Health or his or her designee; the State Superintendent   SB2480- 22 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1of Education or his or her designee; the Commissioner of the 2Chicago Department of Children and Youth Services or his or 3her designee; the Executive Director of the Illinois Violence 4Prevention Authority or his or her designee; the Executive 5Director Chair of the Illinois African American 6African-American Family Commission or his or her designee; and 7the Executive Director Chair of the Latino Family Commission 8or his or her designee; and the Executive Director of the 9Illinois Asian American Commission or his or her designee. In 10addition, there shall be a representative of a local 11government entity coordinating services for children and youth 12and a representative of the Illinois Early Learning Council, 13to be chosen by the chairs.14(Source: P.A. 95-781, eff. 8-5-08.) 15    Section 20-15. The Commission to Study Disproportionate 16Justice Impact Act is amended by changing Section 10 as 17follows: 18    (20 ILCS 4085/10)19    Sec. 10. Composition. The Commission shall be composed of 20the following members:21        (a) Two members of the Senate appointed by the Senate 22    President, one of whom the President shall designate to 23    serve as co-chair, and two members of the Senate appointed 24    by the Minority Leader of the Senate.  SB2480- 23 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1        (b) Two members of the House of Representatives 2    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, 3    one of whom the Speaker shall designate to serve as 4    co-chair, and two members of the House of Representatives 5    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 6    Representatives.7        (c) The following persons or their designees:8            (1) the Attorney General,9            (2) the Chief Judge of the Circuit Court of Cook 10        County,11            (3) the Director of the Illinois State Police,12            (4) the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 13        Department,14            (5) the sheriff of Cook County,15            (6) the State Appellate Defender,16            (7) the Cook County Public Defender,17            (8) the Director of the Office of the State's 18        Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor,19            (9) the Cook County State's Attorney,20            (10) the Executive Director of the Criminal 21        Justice Information Authority,22            (11) the Director of Corrections, 23            (12) the Director of Juvenile Justice, and24            (13) the Executive Director of the Illinois 25        African American African-American Family Commission, .26            (14) the Executive Director of the Illinois Latino   SB2480- 24 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1        Commission; and2            (15) the Executive Director of the Illinois Asian 3        American Commission. 4        (d) The co-chairs may name up to 8 persons, 5    representing minority communities within Illinois, groups 6    involved in the improvement of the administration of 7    justice, behavioral health, criminal justice, law 8    enforcement, and the rehabilitation of former inmates, 9    community groups, and other interested parties. 10(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 11    Section 20-20. The Commission to End Hunger Act is amended 12by changing Section 15 as follows: 13    (20 ILCS 5015/15)14    Sec. 15. Members. The Commission to End Hunger shall be 15composed of no more than 21 voting members including 2 members 16of the Illinois House of Representatives, one appointed by the 17Speaker of the House and one appointed by the House Minority 18Leader; 2 members of the Illinois Senate, one appointed by the 19Senate President and one appointed by the Senate Minority 20Leader; one representative of the Office of the Governor 21appointed by the Governor; one representative of the Office of 22the Lieutenant Governor appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; 23and 15 public members, who shall be appointed by the Governor. 24    The public members shall include 2 representatives of food   SB2480- 25 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1banks; 2 representatives from other community food assistance 2programs; a representative of a statewide organization focused 3on responding to hunger; a representative from an anti-poverty 4organization; a representative of an organization that serves 5or advocates for children and youth; a representative of an 6organization that serves or advocates for older adults; a 7representative of an organization that advocates for people 8who are homeless; a representative of an organization that 9serves or advocates for persons with disabilities; a 10representative of an organization that advocates for 11immigrants; a representative of a municipal or county 12government; and 3 at-large members. The appointed members 13shall reflect the racial, gender, and geographic diversity of 14the State and shall include representation from regions of the 15State.16    The following officials shall serve as ex-officio members: 17the Secretary of Human Services or his or her designee; the 18State Superintendent of Education or his or her designee; the 19Director of Healthcare and Family Services or his or her 20designee; the Director of Children and Family Services or his 21or her designee; the Director of Aging or his or her designee; 22the Director of Natural Resources or his or her designee; and 23the Director of Agriculture or his or her designee. The 24Illinois African American African-American Family Commission, 25the Illinois Asian American Commission, and the Illinois 26Latino Family Commission shall each designate a liaison to   SB2480- 26 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1serve ex-officio on the Commission. 2    Members shall serve without compensation and are 3responsible for the cost of all reasonable and necessary 4travel expenses connected to Commission business, as the State 5of Illinois will not reimburse Commission members for these 6costs. 7    Commission members shall be appointed within 60 days after 8the effective date of this Act. The Commission shall hold 9their initial meetings within 60 days after at least 50% of the 10members have been appointed. 11    The representative of the Office of the Governor and a 12representative of a food bank shall serve as co-chairs of the 13Commission. 14    At the first meeting of the Commission, the members shall 15select a 5-person Steering Committee that includes the 16co-chairs. 17    The Commission may establish committees that address 18specific issues or populations and may appoint individuals 19with relevant expertise who are not appointed members of the 20Commission to serve on committees as needed.21    The Office of the Governor, or a designee of the 22Governor's choosing, shall provide guidance to the Commission. 23Under the leadership of the Office of the Governor, subject to 24appropriation, the Department of Human Services shall also 25provide leadership to support the Commission. The Department 26of Human Services and the State of Illinois shall not incur any   SB2480- 27 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1costs as a result of the creation of the Commission to End 2Hunger as the coordination of meetings, report preparation, 3and other related duties will be completed by a representative 4of a food bank that is serving as a co-chair of the Commission.5(Source: P.A. 102-1119, eff. 1-23-23.) 6    Section 20-25. The Racial and Ethnic Impact Research Task 7Force Act is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 8    (20 ILCS 5025/10)9    Sec. 10. Racial and Ethnic Impact Research Task Force. 10There is created the Racial and Ethnic Impact Research Task 11Force, composed of the following members:12        (1) Two members of the Senate appointed by the Senate 13    President, one of whom the President shall designate to 14    serve as co-chair, and 2 members of the Senate appointed 15    by the Minority Leader of the Senate.16        (2) Two members of the House of Representatives 17    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, 18    one of whom the Speaker shall designate to serve as 19    co-chair, and 2 members of the House of Representatives 20    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 21    Representatives.22        (3) The following persons or their designees:23            (A) the Attorney General,24            (B) the Chief Judge of the Circuit Court of Cook   SB2480- 28 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1        County,2            (C) the Director of the Illinois State Police,3            (D) the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 4        Department,5            (E) the Sheriff of Cook County,6            (F) the State Appellate Defender,7            (G) the Cook County Public Defender,8            (H) the Director of the Office of the State's 9        Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor,10            (I) the Cook County State's Attorney,11            (J) the Executive Director of the Illinois 12        Criminal Justice Information Authority,13            (K) the Director of Corrections,14            (L) the Director of Juvenile Justice, and15            (M) the Executive Director of the Illinois African 16        American African-American Family Commission, .17            (N) the Executive Director of the Illinois Latino 18        Commission, and19            (O) the Executive Director of the Illinois Asian 20        American Commission. 21        (4) The co-chairs may name up to 8 persons, 22    representing minority communities within Illinois, groups 23    involved in the improvement of the administration of 24    justice, behavioral health, criminal justice, law 25    enforcement, and the rehabilitation of former inmates, 26    community groups, and other interested parties.   SB2480- 29 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 2    Section 20-30. The Commission on Equity and Inclusion Act 3is amended by changing Section 40-10 as follows: 4    (30 ILCS 574/40-10)5    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-961)6    Sec. 40-10. Powers and duties. In addition to the other 7powers and duties which may be prescribed in this Act or 8elsewhere, the Commission shall have the following powers and 9duties: 10        (1) The Commission shall have a role in all State and 11    university procurement by facilitating and streamlining 12    communications between the Business Enterprise Council for 13    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities, the 14    purchasing entities, the Chief Procurement Officers, and 15    others. 16        (2) The Commission may create a scoring evaluation for 17    State agency directors, public university presidents and 18    chancellors, and public community college presidents. The 19    scoring shall be based on the following 3 principles: (i) 20    increasing capacity; (ii) growing revenue; and (iii) 21    enhancing credentials. These principles should be the 22    foundation of the agency compliance plan required under 23    Section 6 of the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 24    Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act.  SB2480- 30 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1        (3) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 2    duties provided to it under Section 5-7 of the Illinois 3    Procurement Code. 4        (4) The Commission, working with State agencies, shall 5    provide support for diversity in State hiring. 6        (5) The Commission shall supervise the implementation 7    and effectiveness of supplier diversity training of the 8    State procurement workforce. 9        (6) Each January, and as otherwise frequently as may 10    be deemed necessary and appropriate by the Commission, the 11    Commission shall propose and submit to the Governor and 12    the General Assembly legislative changes to increase 13    inclusion and diversity in State government. 14        (7) The Commission shall have oversight over the 15    following entities: 16            (A) the Illinois African American African-American 17        Family Commission; 18            (B) the Illinois Latino Family Commission; 19            (C) the Asian American Family Commission; 20            (D) the Illinois Muslim American Advisory Council; 21            (E) the Illinois African-American Fair Contracting 22        Commission created under Executive Order 2018-07; and 23            (F) the Business Enterprise Council for 24        Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities. 25        (8) The Commission shall adopt any rules necessary for 26    the implementation and administration of the requirements   SB2480- 31 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    of this Act. 2        (9) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 3    duties provided to it under Section 45-57 of the Illinois 4    Procurement Code. 5        (10) The Commission is responsible for completing 6    studies as required by Section 35-15 of the Illinois 7    Community Reinvestment Act. 8(Source: P.A. 102-29, eff. 6-25-21; 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 9103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 103-959, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 10    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-961)11    Sec. 40-10. Powers and duties. In addition to the other 12powers and duties which may be prescribed in this Act or 13elsewhere, the Commission shall have the following powers and 14duties: 15        (1) The Commission shall have a role in all State and 16    university procurement by facilitating and streamlining 17    communications between the Business Enterprise Council for 18    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities, the 19    purchasing entities, the Chief Procurement Officers, and 20    others. 21        (2) The Commission may create a scoring evaluation for 22    State agency directors, public university presidents and 23    chancellors, and public community college presidents. The 24    scoring shall be based on the following 3 principles: (i) 25    increasing capacity; (ii) growing revenue; and (iii)   SB2480- 32 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    enhancing credentials. These principles should be the 2    foundation of the agency compliance plan required under 3    Section 6 of the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 4    Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act.5        (3) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 6    duties provided to it under Section 5-7 of the Illinois 7    Procurement Code. 8        (4) The Commission, working with State agencies, shall 9    provide support for diversity in State hiring. 10        (5) The Commission shall supervise the implementation 11    and effectiveness of supplier diversity training of the 12    State procurement workforce. 13        (6) Each January, and as otherwise frequently as may 14    be deemed necessary and appropriate by the Commission, the 15    Commission shall propose and submit to the Governor and 16    the General Assembly legislative changes to increase 17    inclusion and diversity in State government. 18        (7) The Commission shall have oversight over the 19    following entities: 20            (A) the Illinois African American African-American 21        Family Commission; 22            (B) the Illinois Latino Family Commission; 23            (C) the Asian American Family Commission; 24            (D) the Illinois Muslim American Advisory Council; 25            (E) the Illinois African-American Fair Contracting 26        Commission created under Executive Order 2018-07; and   SB2480- 33 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1            (F) the Business Enterprise Council for 2        Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities. 3        (7.5) The Commission shall have oversight over the 4    collection of supplier diversity reports by State agencies 5    to the extent that those agencies are required to collect 6    supplier diversity reports. This oversight shall include 7    publishing, on the Commission's website, a copy of each 8    such supplier diversity report submitted to a State agency 9    and may include conducting an annual hearing with each 10    State agency to discuss ongoing compliance with supplier 11    diversity reporting requirements. The Commission is not 12    responsible for ensuring compliance by the filers of 13    supplier diversity reports to their respective agencies. 14    The agencies subject to oversight by the Commission and 15    the relevant voluntary supplier diversity reports include 16    the following:17            (A) the Health Facilities and Services Review 18        Board for hospitals; 19            (B) the Department of Commerce and Economic 20        Opportunity for tax credit recipients under the 21        Economic Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit 22        Act; 23            (C) the Illinois Commerce Commission for utilities 24        and railroads; 25            (D) the Illinois Gaming Board for casinos; and 26            (E) the Illinois Racing Board for race tracks.   SB2480- 34 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1        (7.6) The Commission may hold public workshops focused 2    on specific industries and reports to collaboratively 3    connect diverse enterprises with entities that manage 4    supplier diversity programs. These workshops may be 5    modeled after Illinois Commerce Commission hearings for 6    utilities and railroads that include a collaborative 7    discussion of filed supplier diversity reports. 8        (8) The Commission shall adopt any rules necessary for 9    the implementation and administration of the requirements 10    of this Act. 11        (9) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 12    duties provided to it under Section 45-57 of the Illinois 13    Procurement Code. 14        (10) The Commission is responsible for completing 15    studies as required by Section 35-15 of the Illinois 16    Community Reinvestment Act. 17(Source: P.A. 102-29, eff. 6-25-21; 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 18103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 103-959, eff. 1-1-25; 103-961, eff. 197-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 20    Section 20-35. The Illinois Human Rights Act is amended by 21changing Section 7-101 as follows: 22    (775 ILCS 5/7-101)  (from Ch. 68, par. 7-101)23    Sec. 7-101. Powers and duties. In addition to other powers 24and duties prescribed in this Act, the Department shall have   SB2480- 35 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1the following powers:2    (A) Rules and Regulations. To adopt, promulgate, amend, 3and rescind rules and regulations not inconsistent with the 4provisions of this Act pursuant to the Illinois Administrative 5Procedure Act.6    (B) Charges. To issue, receive, investigate, conciliate, 7settle, and dismiss charges filed in conformity with this Act.8    (C) Compulsory Process. To request subpoenas as it deems 9necessary for its investigations.10    (D) Complaints. To file complaints with the Commission in 11conformity with this Act and to intervene in complaints 12pending before the Commission filed under Article 2, 4, 5, 5A, 13or 6.14    (E) Judicial Enforcement. To seek temporary relief and to 15enforce orders of the Commission in conformity with this Act.16    (F) Equal Employment Opportunities. To take such action as 17may be authorized to provide for equal employment 18opportunities and affirmative action.19    (G) Recruitment; Research; Public Communication; Advisory 20Councils. To engage in such recruitment, research and public 21communication and create such advisory councils as may be 22authorized to effectuate the purposes of this Act.23    (H) Coordination with other Agencies. To coordinate its 24activities with federal, state, and local agencies in 25conformity with this Act.26    (H-5) Support Commissions. To provide administrative and   SB2480- 36 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1technical support to assist the Illinois Latino Commission, 2Illinois African American Commission, and Illinois Asian 3American Commission in carrying out their duties. 4    (I) Grants; Private Gifts.5        (1) To accept public grants and private gifts as may 6    be authorized.7        (2) To design grant programs and award grants to 8    eligible recipients. 9    (J) Education and Training. To implement a formal and 10unbiased program of education and training for all employees 11assigned to investigate and conciliate charges under Articles 127A and 7B. The training program shall include the following:13        (1) substantive and procedural aspects of the 14    investigation and conciliation positions;15        (2) current issues in human rights law and practice;16        (3) lectures by specialists in substantive areas 17    related to human rights matters;18        (4) orientation to each operational unit of the 19    Department and Commission;20        (5) observation of experienced Department 21    investigators and attorneys conducting conciliation 22    conferences, combined with the opportunity to discuss 23    evidence presented and rulings made;24        (6) the use of hypothetical cases requiring the 25    Department investigator and conciliation conference 26    attorney to issue judgments as a means to evaluating   SB2480- 37 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1    knowledge and writing ability;2        (7) writing skills;3        (8) computer skills, including but not limited to word 4    processing and document management.5    A formal, unbiased and ongoing professional development 6program including, but not limited to, the above-noted areas 7shall be implemented to keep Department investigators and 8attorneys informed of recent developments and issues and to 9assist them in maintaining and enhancing their professional 10competence.11    (K) Hotlines. To establish and maintain hotlines and 12helplines to aid in effectuating the purposes of this Act 13including the confidential reporting of discrimination, 14harassment, and bias incidents. All communications received or 15sent via the hotlines and helplines are exempt from disclosure 16under the Freedom of Information Act. 17(Source: P.A. 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 103-335, eff. 1-1-24; 18103-859, eff. 1-1-25.) 19Article 99. Other Provisions 20    Section 99-95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act 21makes changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by 22text that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a 23Section represented by multiple versions), the use of that 24text does not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the   SB2480- 38 -LRB104 11835 SPS 21925 b1changes made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any 2other Public Act.